North Carolina, session 2025, HB488.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. ESTABLISH SEPARATE ACHIEVEMENT AND GROWTH GRADES
SECTION 1.1. G.S. 115C-12(9) reads as rewritten:
"(9) Miscellaneous Powers and Duties. – All the powers and duties exercised by
the State Board of Education shall be in conformity with the Constitution and
subject to such laws as may be enacted from time to time by the General
Assembly. Among such duties are:
…
c1. To issue an annual "report card" for the State and for each local school
administrative unit, assessing each unit's efforts to improve student
performance based on the growth in performance of the students in
each school and taking into account progress over the previous years'
level of performance and the State's performance in comparison with
other states. This assessment shall take into account factors that have
been shown to affect student performance and that the State Board
considers relevant to assess the State's efforts to improve student
performance. The annual "report card" for each local school
administrative unit shall include the following:
1. The State Board shall award, in accordance with
G.S. 115C-83.15, an overall numerical school achievement,
growth, and performance score on a scale of zero to 100
achievement and school growth scores and a separate
corresponding performance school achievement and school
growth letter grade grades of A, B, C, D, or F earned by each
school within the local school administrative unit. The school
performance score and grade achievement and growth scores
and grades shall reflect the measures required for achievement
and growth, respectively, by G.S. 115C-83.15, in measures
such as student performance on annual subject-specific
assessments, college and workplace readiness measures,
*H488-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
graduation rates, and student progress in achieving English
language proficiency. In addition, the State Board shall award
separate performance scores and grades for the following:
I. School performance achievement and school growth of
certain subgroups of students as provided in
G.S. 115C-83.15.
II. For schools serving students in any grade from
kindergarten to eighth grade, school achievement and
school growth performance in reading and mathematics
respectively.
…."
SECTION 1.2. G.S. 115C-47(58) reads as rewritten:
"(58) To Inform the Public About the North Carolina School Report Cards Issued
by the State Board of Education. – Each local board of education shall ensure
that the report card issued for it by the State Board of Education receives wide
distribution to the local press or is otherwise provided to the public. Each local
board of education shall ensure that the overall school performance score
achievement and growth scores and grade grades earned by each school in the
local school administrative unit for the current and previous four school years
is are prominently displayed on the Web site of the local school administrative
unit. If any school in the local school administrative unit earned an overall a
school performance achievement or growth grade of D or F, the local board
of education shall provide notice of the grade in writing to the parent or
guardian of all students enrolled in that school."
SECTION 1.3. G.S. 115C-83.15 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-83.15. School achievement, growth, performance scores, achievement scores,
growth scores, and grades.
(a) School Scores and Grades. – The State Board of Education shall award school
achievement, growth, and performance achievement and school growth scores and an associated
performance grade grades as required by G.S. 115C-12(9)c1., and calculated as provided in this
section.
…
(b1) Calculation of School Achievement Grades. – For all schools, the score for school
achievement, as provided in subsection (b) of this section, shall be used to determine the school
achievement grade. The school achievement grade shall be based on the following scale and shall
not be modified to add any other designation related to other performance measures, such as a
"plus" or "minus":
(1) A score of at least 85 is equivalent to a school achievement grade of A.
(2) A score of at least 70 is equivalent to a school achievement grade of B.
(3) A score of at least 55 is equivalent to a school achievement grade of C.
(4) A score of at least 40 is equivalent to a school achievement grade of D.
(5) A score of less than 40 is equivalent to a school achievement grade of F.
(c) Calculation of the School Growth Score. – Using the Education Value-Added
Assessment System (EVAAS), the State Board shall calculate the overall growth score earned
by schools. In calculating the total growth score earned by schools, the State Board of Education
shall weight student growth on the achievement measures as provided in subsection (b) of this
section that have available growth values; provided that for schools serving students in grades
nine through 12, the growth score shall only include growth values for measures calculated under
sub-subdivisions a. and b. of subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of this section. The numerical
values used to determine whether a school has met, exceeded, or has not met expected growth
Page 2 House Bill 488-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
shall be translated to a 100-point scale and used for school reporting purposes as provided in
G.S. 115C-12(9)c1., 115C-218.65, 115C-238.66, and 116-239.8.
(c1) Calculation of School Growth Grades. – For all schools, the score for school growth,
as provided in subsection (c) of this section, shall be converted by the State Board of Education
to a 100-point scale and used to determine the school growth grade. The school growth grade
shall be based on the following scale and shall not be modified to add any other designation
related to other performance measures, such as a "plus" or "minus":
(1) A score of at least 90 is equivalent to a school growth grade of A.
(2) A score of at least 80 is equivalent to a school growth grade of B.
(3) A score of at least 70 is equivalent to a school growth grade of C.
(4) A score of at least 60 is equivalent to a school growth grade of D.
(5) A score of less than 60 is equivalent to a school growth grade of F.
(d) Calculation of the Overall School Performance Scores and Grades. – The State Board
of Education shall calculate the overall school performance score by adding the school
achievement score, as provided in subsection (b) of this section, and the school growth score, as
determined using EVAAS as provided in subsection (c) of this section, earned by a school. The
school achievement score shall account for eighty percent (80%), and the school growth score
shall account for twenty percent (20%) of the total sum. For all schools, the total school
performance score shall be converted to a 100-point scale and used to determine an overall school
performance grade. The overall school performance grade shall be based on the following scale
and shall not be modified to add any other designation related to other performance measures,
such as a "plus" or "minus":
(1) A school performance score of at least 85 is equivalent to an overall school
performance grade of A.
(2) A school performance score of at least 70 is equivalent to an overall school
performance grade of B.
(3) A school performance score of at least 55 is equivalent to an overall school
performance grade of C.
(4) A school performance score of at least 40 is equivalent to an overall school
performance grade of D.
(5) A school performance score of less than 40 points is equivalent to an overall
school performance grade of F.
(d1) Establishment of Subgroups of Students. – The State Board shall establish the
minimum number of students in a subgroup served by a school that is necessary to disaggregate
information on student performance and to determine a subgroup performance score achievement
and subgroup growth scores and grade associated grades for the following subgroups of students:
(1) Economically disadvantaged students.
(2) Students from major racial and ethnic groups.
(3) Children with disabilities.
(4) English learners.
(d2) Calculation of the School Performance Scores and Achievement and School Growth
Scores and Corresponding Grades for Certain Subgroups of Students Served by a School. – In
addition to the overall school performance achievement and school growth scores and
corresponding grades awarded under subsections (b) through (c1) of this section, for each school
that serves a minimum number of students in a subgroup of students listed in subsection (d1) of
this section, the State Board of Education shall calculate school performance achievement and
school growth scores and shall determine a corresponding school performance grade grades for
each subgroup using the same method as set forth in subsection (d) subsections (b) through (c1)
of this section. School performance achievement and school growth scores for subgroups of
students shall not be included in the calculation of the overall school performance achievement
House Bill 488-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
and school growth scores and corresponding grades under subsection (d) subsections (b) through
(c1) of this section.
(d3) Report of Subgroup Performance Scores and School Achievement and School
Growth Scores and Corresponding Grades. – The subgroup performance school achievement and
school growth scores and associated grades shall be reported separately on the annual school
report card provided under G.S. 115C-12(9)c1., 115C-218.65, 115C-238.66, and 116-239.8 in a
way that provides the following information:
(1) For the current year and the previous two years, the achievement score for
each subgroup of students defined in subsection (d1) of this section for the
school.
(2) The statewide average achievement score for each subgroup defined in
subsection (d1) of this section.
(3) The difference between the achievement score for all students in the school
and the achievement score for each subgroup that meets the minimum number
of students defined in subsection (d1) of this section.
(4) Based on the information reported in subdivision (3) of this subsection, the
State Board shall determine and identify schools that are closing achievement
gaps, experiencing a widening of gaps, or seeing no significant gap changes.
…
(f) Indication of Growth. – In addition to awarding the overall school scores for
achievement, growth, and performance and the performance grade, achievement and growth and
associated grades, using EVAAS, the State Board shall designate that a school has met, exceeded,
or has not met expected growth. The designation of student growth shall be clearly displayed in
the annual school report card provided under G.S. 115C-12(9)c1., 115C-218.65, 115C-238.66,
and 116-239.8.
(g) Access to Annual Report Card Information on the Department's Web Site. –
Beginning with data collected in the 2017-2018 school year, the State Board of Education shall
provide user-friendly access to the public on the annual report cards issued for local school
administrative units and individual schools provided under G.S. 115C-12(9)c1., 115C-218.65,
115C-238.66, and 116-239.8 through the Department of Public Instruction's Web site. The annual
report card shall be designed and organized to display the following information more
prominently than any other information:
(1) A summary for each local school administrative unit and for each individual
school of the school performance achievement and growth grades, whether
the school has met, exceeded, or has not met expected growth, and any other
information required to be provided as part of the annual report card.
(2) The percentage of schools receiving an overall a school performance
achievement letter grade of A, B, C, D, or F earned by each school located
within a local school administrative unit and statewide.
(2a) The percentage of schools receiving a school growth letter grade of A, B, C,
D, or F earned by each school located within a local school administrative unit
and statewide.
(3) The number and percentage of schools that have met, exceeded, or have not
met expected growth by each school located within a local school
administrative unit and statewide.
(4) A Web page for each individual school that prominently displays the school's
performance achievement and growth grades, whether the school has met,
exceeded, or has not met expected growth, and the school's performance
achievement and growth scores in a way that is easy for the user to read.
(5) The ability to easily compare annual report card information, including school
performance achievement and growth grades and whether schools have met,
Page 4 House Bill 488-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
exceeded, or have not met expected growth, for local school administrative
units and for individual schools for a time span of at least three years."
SECTION 1.4. G.S. 115C-83.17 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-83.17. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Part:
(1) Achievement score. – A numerical score on a scale of zero to 100 that is based
on the sum of points earned by a school or by a subgroup of students pursuant
to G.S. 115C-83.15.
(2) Growth score. – A numerical score measuring student growth calculated for a
school or for a subgroup of students pursuant to G.S. 115C-83.15.
(3) Overall school performance grade. School grades. – The letter grade grades
earned by a school for achievement and growth for all students served by a
school pursuant to G.S. 115C-83.15(d).G.S. 115C-83.15(b1) and (c1).
(4) Overall school performance score. School scores. – The numerical score
scores earned by a school that is calculated by adding the school achievement
score and the school growth score earned by a school for achievement and
growth pursuant to G.S. 115C-83.15(d).G.S. 115C-83.15(b) and (c).
(5) Subgroup performance grade. grades. – The letter grade grades earned by a
school for achievement and growth for a subgroup of students served by the
school pursuant to G.S. 115C-83.15(d2).
(6) Subgroup performance score. scores. – The numerical score scores earned by
a school that is calculated by adding the for subgroup achievement score and
the subgroup growth score earned by a school that are converted to a 100-point
scale pursuant to G.S. 115C-83.15(d2)."

PART II. CONFORMING CHANGES
SECTION 2.1. G.S. 115C-83.16 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-83.16. School performance indicators for the purpose of compliance with federal
law.
(a) The State Board of Education shall use the school performance achievement and
growth scores and grades as calculated required under G.S. 115C-83.15 to satisfy the federal
requirement under the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, as amended by the
Every Student Succeeds Act (ESSA), P.L. 114-95, to meaningfully differentiate the performance
of schools on an annual basis. For the purpose of compliance with federal law, the State Board
of Education shall calculate the overall school performance score by adding the school
achievement score and the school growth score earned by a school. The school achievement score
shall account for eighty percent (80%), and the school growth score shall account for twenty
percent (20%) of the total sum. Additionally, the indicators shall be defined as follows:
…
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section and only for the purpose of conforming
with ESSA, the State Board may label measures as indicators different from those described in
subsection (a) of this section; provided that each measure shall be calculated in accordance with
the requirements of G.S. 115C-83.15.section."
SECTION 2.2. G.S. 115C-105.37 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-105.37. Identification of low-performing schools.
(a) Identification of Low-Performing Schools. – The State Board of Education shall
identify low-performing schools on an annual basis. Low-performing schools are those that earn
an overall a school performance achievement grade of D or F and a school growth score of "met
expected growth" or "not met expected growth" as defined by G.S. 115C-83.15.
(a1) Plan for Improvement of Low-Performing Schools. – If a school has been identified
as low-performing as provided in this section and the school is not located in a local school
House Bill 488-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
administrative unit identified as low-performing under G.S. 115C-105.39A, the following
actions shall be taken:
(1) The superintendent shall proceed under G.S. 115C-105.39.
(2) Within 30 days of the initial identification of a school as low-performing by
the State Board, the superintendent shall submit to the local board of education
a preliminary plan for improving both the school performance grade and
school growth score, grades, including how the superintendent and other
central office administrators will work with the school and monitor the
school's progress.
…
(b) Parental Notice of Low-Performing School Status. – Each school that the State Board
identifies as low-performing shall provide written notification to the parents and guardians of
students attending that school within 30 days of the identification that includes the following
information:
(1) A statement that the State Board of Education has found that the school has
earned an overall a school performance achievement grade of D or F and a
school growth score of "met expected growth" or "not met expected growth"
and has been identified as a low-performing school as defined by
G.S. 115C-105.37. this section. The statement shall include an explanation of
the school performance grades and growth scores.achievement and growth
scores and grades.
(2) The school performance grade and growth score achievement and growth
scores and grades earned.
(3) Information about the preliminary plan developed under subsection (a1) of
this section and the availability of the final plan on the local school
administrative unit's Web site.
(4) The meeting date for when the preliminary plan will be considered by the local
board of education.
(5) A description of any additional steps the school is taking to improve student
performance."
SECTION 2.3. G.S. 115C-105.39A reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-105.39A. Identification of low-performing local school administrative units.
(a) Identification of Low-Performing Local School Administrative Units. – The State
Board of Education shall identify low-performing local school administrative units on an annual
basis. A low-performing local school administrative unit is a unit in which the majority of the
schools in that unit that earned an overall school performance grade and school growth score
achievement and growth scores and grades as provided in G.S. 115C-83.15 have been identified
as low-performing schools, as provided in G.S. 115C-105.37.
(b) Plan for Improvement of Low-Performing Local School Administrative Units. – Once
a local school administrative unit has been identified as low-performing under this section, the
following actions shall be taken:
(1) The superintendent shall proceed under G.S. 115C-105.39.
(2) Within 30 days of the identification of a local school administrative unit as
low-performing by the State Board, the superintendent shall submit to the
local board of education a preliminary plan for improving both the school
performance grade and school growth score achievement and growth scores
and grades of each low-performing school in the unit, including how the
superintendent and other central office administrators will work with each
low-performing school and monitor the low-performing school's progress and
how current local school administrative unit policy should be changed to
improve student achievement throughout the local school administrative unit.
Page 6 House Bill 488-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
The plan shall also include specific strategies to improve early childhood
learning along with measurable goals.
…
(c) Parental Notice of Low-Performing Local School Administrative Unit Status. – Each
local school administrative unit that the State Board identifies as low-performing shall provide
written notification to the parents and guardians of all students attending any school in the local
school administrative unit within 30 days of the identification that includes the following
information:
(1) A statement that the State Board of Education has found that a majority of the
schools in the local school administrative unit have earned an overall a school
performance achievement grade of D or F and a school growth score of "met
expected growth" or "not met expected growth" and have been identified as
low-performing schools as defined by G.S. 115C-105.37. The statement shall
also include an explanation of the school performance grades and school
growth scores.achievement and growth scores and grades.
(2) The percentage of schools identified as low-performing.
(3) Information about the preliminary plan developed under subsection (b) of this
section and the availability of the final plan on the local school administrative
unit's Web site.
(4) The meeting date for when the preliminary plan will be considered by the local
board of education.
(5) A description of any additional steps the local school administrative unit and
schools are taking to improve student performance.
(6) For notifications sent to parents and guardians of students attending a school
that is identified as low-performing under G.S. 115C-105.37, a statement that
the State Board of Education has found that the school has earned an overall
a school performance achievement grade of D or F and a school growth score
of "met expected growth" or "not met expected growth" and has been
identified as a low-performing school as defined by G.S. 115C-105.37. This
notification also shall include the overall school performance grade and school
growth score the school achievement and growth scores and grades earned
and an explanation of the school performance grades and school growth
scores.achievement and growth scores and grades."
SECTION 2.4. G.S. 115C-218.65 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-218.65. North Carolina School Report Cards.
A charter school shall ensure that the report card issued for it by the State Board of Education
receives wide distribution to the local press or is otherwise provided to the public. A charter
school shall ensure that the overall school performance score achievement and growth scores and
grade grades earned by the charter school for the current and previous four school years is are
prominently displayed on the school Web site. If a charter school earned an overall a school
performance achievement or growth grade of D or F, the charter school shall provide notice of
the grade in writing to the parent or guardian of all students enrolled in that school."
SECTION 2.5. G.S. 115C-218.94(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Identification of Low-Performing Charter Schools. – The State Board of Education
shall identify low-performing charter schools on an annual basis. Low-performing charter
schools are those that earn an overall a school performance achievement grade of D or F and a
school growth score of "met expected growth" or "not met expected growth" as defined by
G.S. 115C-83.15."
SECTION 2.6. G.S. 115C-238.66(11) reads as rewritten:
"(11) North Carolina School Report Cards. – A regional school shall ensure that the
report card issued for it by the State Board of Education receives wide
House Bill 488-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
distribution to the local press or is otherwise provided to the public. A regional
school shall ensure that the overall school performance score achievement and
growth scores and grade grades earned by the regional school for the current
and previous four school years is are prominently displayed on the school Web
site. If a regional school earned an overall a school performance achievement
or growth grade of D or F, the regional school shall provide notice of the grade
in writing to the parent or guardian of all students enrolled in that school."
SECTION 2.7. G.S. 116-239.8(b)(14) reads as rewritten:
"(14) North Carolina school report cards. – A laboratory school shall ensure that the
report card issued for it by the State Board of Education receives wide
distribution to the local press or is otherwise provided to the public. A
laboratory school shall ensure that the overall school performance score
achievement and growth scores and grade grades earned by the laboratory
school for the current and previous four school years is are prominently
displayed on the school Web site. If a laboratory school earned an overall a
school performance achievement or growth grade of D or F, the laboratory
school shall provide notice of the grade in writing to the parent or guardian of
all students enrolled in that school."
SECTION 2.8. G.S. 116-239.13(3) reads as rewritten:
"(3) Public school student achievement data, including school performance grades
and student achievement scores and student growth, achievement and growth
scores and grades at each laboratory school."

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE AND APPLICABILITY CLAUSE
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective January 1, 2026, and applies to school
achievement grades, growth grades, and report cards issued based on data from the 2025-2026
school year.
Page 8 House Bill 488-First Edition